Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3972
Adulteration or misbranding; stop-sale, stop-use, or removal order; issuance; hearing.

Whenever a regulatory agency finds milk or milk products being manufactured, processed, transported, distributed, offered for sale, or sold, in violation of the adulteration or misbranding provisions of the Nebraska Milk Act, it shall have the authority to issue and enforce a written or printed stop-sale, stop-use, or removal order to the person in charge of such milk or milk product only if the issuance of such an order is necessary for the protection of the public health, safety, or welfare. Such an order shall specifically describe the nature of the violation found and the precise action necessary to bring the milk or milk products into compliance with the applicable provisions of the act. Such an order shall clearly advise the person in charge of the milk or milk products that he or she may request an immediate hearing before the director or his or her designee on the matter. The issuance of orders under this section shall be limited to instances in which no alternative course of action would sufficiently protect the public health, safety, or welfare.

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 198, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 2-3907;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 8.